California, session 20252026, SB1080.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 26807 of the Government Code is amended to read:26807. (a) The county clerk shall keep an official seal of their office for use when performing official duties other than ex officio duties which shall, when embossed, stamped, impressed or affixed to a certification, show legibly. The seal shall: (a) be circular in shape; (b) be not less than 11/4 inches in diameter; (c) have in the center any words or design adopted by the county clerk; (d) have inscribed around the central words or design, “County Clerk, ____ County, California”, inserting therein the name of the county.(b) Nothing contained herein shall prohibit a county clerk from continuing to use a seal of a design different than that specified herein if the seal has customarily been used prior to the effective date of Section 1 of Chapter 564 of the Statutes of 1968.SEC. 2. Section 26807.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:26807.5. The county clerk may use a printed, stamped, photographically reproduced facsimile, electronic, or otherwise digitally created signature in certifying to a record in the county clerk’s office, provided that the certification includes the official seal of the county clerk’s office affixed thereto.